Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-118
Militia; draft for service; apportionment.

In case of a draft, the Governor shall apportion it equitably among the several counties, taking care that the apportionment shall equitably be made among the several townships or precincts of the county, in such manner as he may prescribe. He shall in case of any such draft appoint a time and place of assembly, and shall have such other and further power as may be necessary to carry into effect the provisions of this code relative to any such draft.

Laws 1909, c. 90, § 16, p. 371;

R.S.1913, § 3915;

C.S.1922, § 3324;

C.S.1929, § 55-151;

R.S.1943, § 55-181;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 16, p. 1586.

"This code", see section 55-101.